California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

17030.

“Loss leader” means any article or product sold at less than cost:

(a) Where the purpose is to induce, promote or encourage the purchase of other merchandise; or

(b) Where the effect is a tendency or capacity to mislead or deceive purchasers or prospective purchasers; or

(c) Where the effect is to divert trade from or otherwise injure competitors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17031.

Locality discrimination means a discrimination between different sections, communities or cities or portions thereof, or between different locations in such sections, communities, cities or portions thereof in this State, by selling or furnishing an article or product, at a lower price in one section, community or city, or any portion thereof, or in one location in such section, community, or city or any portion thereof, than in another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Offenses Against the Chapter [17040. - 17051.]

17040.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in the production, manufacture, distribution or sale of any article or product of general use or consumption, with intent to destroy the competition of any regular established dealer in such article or product, or to prevent the competition of any person who in good faith, intends and attempts to become such dealer, to create locality discriminations.

Nothing in this section prohibits the meeting in good faith of a competitive price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits locality discriminations which make allowances for differences, if any, in the grade, quality or quantity when based and justified in the cost of manufacture, sale or delivery, or the actual cost of transportation from the point of production, if a raw product or commodity, or from the point of manufacture if a manufactured product or commodity, or from the point of shipment to the point of destination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits any of the following:

(a) A selection of customers.

(b) A functional classification by any person of any customer as broker, jobber, wholesaler or retailer.

(c) A differential in price for any article or product as between any customers in different functional classifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17043.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in business within this State to sell any article or product at less than the cost thereof to such vendor, or to give away any article or product, for the purpose of injuring competitors or destroying competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17044.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in business within this State to sell or use any article or product as a “loss leader” as defined in Section 17030 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 334.)
-------------------------------------------

17045.

The secret payment or allowance of rebates, refunds, commissions, or unearned discounts, whether in the form of money or otherwise, or secretly extending to certain purchasers special services or privileges not extended to all purchasers purchasing upon like terms and conditions, to the injury of a competitor and where such payment or allowance tends to destroy competition, is unlawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17046.

It is unlawful for any person to use any threat, intimidation, or boycott, to effectuate any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17047.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, jobber, contractor, broker, retailer, or other vendor, or any agent of any such person, to solicit any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17048.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, jobber, contractor, broker, retailer, or other vendor, or any agent of any such person, jointly to participate or collude with any other such person in the violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17048.5.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, jobber, contractor, broker, retailer, or other vendor, or any agent of any such person, to enter into a contract with any service or repair agency for the performance of warranty service and repair for products manufactured, distributed, or sold by such person, below the cost to such service or repair agency of performing the warranty service or repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

17049.

The prohibitions of this chapter against locality discrimination and sales below cost embrace any scheme of special rebates, collateral contracts or any device of any nature whereby such discrimination or sale below cost is in substance or fact effected in violation of the spirit and intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17050.

The prohibitions of this chapter against locality discriminations, sales below cost, and loss leaders do not apply to any sale made:

(a) In closing out in good faith the owner’s stock or any part thereof for the purpose of discontinuing his trade in any such article or product and in the case of the sale of seasonal goods or to the bona fide sale of perishable goods to prevent loss to the vendor by spoilage or depreciation; provided, notice is given to the public thereof.

(b) When the goods are damaged or deteriorated in quality, and notice is given to the public thereof.

(c) By an officer acting under the orders of any court.

(d) In an endeavor made in good faith to meet the legal prices of a competitor selling the same article or product, in the same locality or trade area and in the ordinary channels of trade.

(e) In an endeavor made in good faith by a manufacturer, selling an article or product of his own manufacture, in a transaction and sale to a wholesaler or retailer for resale to meet the legal prices of a competitor selling the same or a similar or comparable article or product, in the same locality or trade area and in the ordinary channels of trade.

The notice required to be given under this section shall not be sufficient unless the subject of such sales is kept separate from other stocks and clearly and legibly marked with the reason for such sales, and any advertisement of such goods must indicate the same facts and the number of items to be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17051.

Any contract, express or implied, made by any person, firm, or corporation in violation of this chapter is an illegal contract and no recovery thereon shall be had.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Civil Liability [17070. - 17087.]

17070.

Any person or trade association may bring an action to enjoin and restrain any violation of this chapter and, in addition thereto, for the recovery of damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.

In all actions brought under this chapter proof of one or more acts of selling or giving away any article or product below cost or at discriminatory prices, together with proof of the injurious effect of such acts, is presumptive evidence of the purpose or intent to injure competitors or destroy competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.5.

In all actions brought under this chapter proof of limitation of the quantity of any article or product sold or offered for sale to any one customer to a quantity less than the entire supply thereof owned or possessed by the seller or which he is otherwise authorized to sell at the place of such sale or offering for sale, together with proof that the price at which the article or product is so sold or offered for sale is in fact below its invoice or replacement cost, whichever is lower, raises a presumption of the purpose or intent to injure competitors or destroy competition. This section applies only to sales by persons conducting a retail business the principal part of
 which involves the resale to consumers of commodities purchased or acquired for that purpose, as distinguished from persons principally engaged in the sale to consumers of commodities of their own production or manufacture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.

Where a particular trade or industry, of which a person complained against is a member, has an established cost survey for the locality and vicinity in which the offense is committed, that cost survey is competent evidence to be used in proving the costs of such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.

Proof of average overall cost of doing business for any particular inventory period when added to the cost of production of each article or product, as to a producer, or invoice or replacement cost, whichever is lower, of each article or product, as to a distributor, is presumptive evidence of cost of each such article or product involved in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.

Proof of transportation tariffs when fixed and approved by the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California is presumptive evidence of delivery cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1638.)
-------------------------------------------

17075.

In any action where it is alleged and shown that the person complained against is selling below his cost of doing business, and such person is including labor at less than the prevailing wage scale in the trade in which such person is engaged for the locality or vicinity in which he is doing business, evidence of such prevailing wage scale shall be admissible to prove the intent or purpose of such person to violate this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17076.

In any action brought under this chapter, where persons are employed or performing services for any person or in the conduct of the business wherein such person is charged with a violation of this chapter, and are so employed or performing such services without compensation or at a wage lower than that prevailing at the time and place of the service for the particular services performed, such services shall be charged as an expense of the business in which rendered and at the rate of the wage for the services rendered prevailing at the time of the service at the place where rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17077.

In any action or prosecution for sales below cost in violation of this chapter, if the defendant acquires his raw materials for a consideration not wholly or definitely computable in money, the cost of the raw materials shall be presumed to be the prevailing market price for similar raw materials in the ordinary channels of trade in the locality or vicinity in which such raw materials were acquired, at the time of the acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.

If it appears to the court upon any application for a temporary restraining order, or upon the hearing of any order to show cause why a preliminary injunction should not be issued, or upon the hearing of any motion for a preliminary injunction, or if the court shall find, in any such action, that any defendant therein is violating, or has violated, this chapter, then the court shall enjoin the defendant from doing all acts which are prohibited by the section, or sections, of which any provision thereof is being violated, or has been violated, by the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17079.

The court may, in its discretion, include in any injunction against a violation of this chapter such other restraint as it may deem expedient in order to deter the defendant from, and insure against, his committing a future violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17080.

Any injunction against a violation of this chapter, whether interim or final, shall cover every article or product and not merely the particular article or product involved in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17081.

It is not necessary for the plaintiff, in any action under this chapter, to provide or file any undertaking or bond for the issuance of any interim or final injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17082.

In any action under this chapter, it is not necessary to allege or prove actual damages or the threat thereof, or actual injury or the threat thereof, to the plaintiff. But, in addition to injunctive relief, any plaintiff in any such action shall be entitled to recover three times the amount of the actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff, as well as three times the actual damages, if any, sustained by any person who has assigned to the plaintiff his claim for damages resulting from a violation of this chapter.

In any action under this chapter in which judgment is entered against the defendant the plaintiff shall be awarded
 a reasonable attorney’s fee together with the costs of suit.

The amendments to this section adopted at the 1959 Regular Session of the Legislature do not apply to any action commenced prior to September 18, 1959.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2074.)
-------------------------------------------

17083.

The testimony of any witness in any action brought under this chapter may be taken by deposition. The provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2002) of Title 3 of Part 4 of, and the provisions of Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of, the Code of Civil Procedure are applicable to the witness, the testimony and the deposition.

In addition, the books and records of any party, or of any such witness, may be subpoenaed into court and introduced into evidence, or introduced,
 by reference, into evidence, and may be required to be produced at the taking of the deposition of any party or of any such witness and there inquired into.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

17084.

Any party to any action brought under this chapter may, upon notice, apply to the court in which the action is pending, or to any judge thereof, for an order requiring any other party to give to the applicant, within a specified time, an inspection and copy, or permission to take a copy, of entries of accounts in any book, or of any documents, papers, or memoranda in such party’s possession or under his control containing evidence relating to the merits of any such action or any defense therein.

If a compliance with the order is refused, the court shall exclude the entries of accounts in any such book, or any such document, paper, or
 memorandum from being given in evidence by the other party, or if wanted as evidence by the applicant the court shall presume them to be as the applicant alleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17085.

If, at any time while any action for a violation of this chapter is pending, it appears to the court that an extensive examination of books, papers, records, or documents is or may become material or relevant to the issues in the action, the court may, in its discretion, upon the application of any party to the action, or upon its own motion, order a reference to be had in the manner and form provided in Part 2, Title 8, Chapter 6 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17086.

No information obtained under this article, or under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, may be used against any party, or any witness, as a basis for a misdemeanor or felony prosecution in any court of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17087.

In any action or proceeding, civil or criminal, brought by the Attorney General or any district attorney for the violation of this chapter, no person shall be excused from attending, testifying or producing books, papers, or documents in obedience to subpoena or under order of court on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to any penalty.

No individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he may so testify or produce evidence in any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General or
 district attorney under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Liability of Agents [17095. - 17096.]

17095.

Any person, who, either as director, officer or agent of any firm or corporation or as agent of any person, violating the provisions of this chapter, assists or aids, directly or indirectly, in such violation is responsible therefor equally with the person, firm or corporation for which he acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17096.

In any injunction proceeding against any person as officer, director or agent, it is sufficient to allege and prove the unlawful intent of the person, firm or corporation for which he acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Penal Provisions [17100. - 17101.]

17100.

Any person, whether as principal, agent, officer or director, for himself, or for another person, or for any firm or corporation, or any corporation, who or which violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor for each single violation and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment not exceeding six months or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17101.

In the prosecution of any person as officer, director or agent, it is sufficient to allege and prove the unlawful intent of the person, firm or corporation for which he acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Enforcement [17200. - 17210.]

17200.

As used in this chapter, unfair competition shall mean and include any unlawful, unfair or fraudulent business act or practice and unfair, deceptive, untrue or misleading advertising and any act prohibited by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.

As used in this chapter, the term person shall mean and include natural persons, corporations, firms, partnerships, joint stock companies, associations and other organizations of persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.5.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board within the Department of Consumer Affairs” includes any commission, bureau, division, or other similarly constituted agency within the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) “Local consumer affairs agency” means and includes any city or county body which primarily provides consumer protection services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

Notwithstanding Section 3369 of the Civil Code, specific or preventive relief may be granted to enforce a penalty, forfeiture, or penal law in a case of unfair competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

17203.

Injunctive Relief—Court Orders

Any person who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in unfair competition may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make such orders or judgments, including the appointment of a receiver, as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by any person of any practice which constitutes unfair competition, as defined in this chapter, or as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of such unfair competition. Any person may pursue representative claims or relief on behalf of others only if the claimant meets the standing requirements of Section 17204 and complies with Section 382 of the Code of Civil Procedure, but these limitations do not apply to claims brought under this chapter by the Attorney General, or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.

Actions for Injunctions by Attorney General, District Attorney, County Counsel, and City Attorneys

Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter shall be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General or a district attorney or by a county counsel authorized by agreement with the district attorney in actions involving violation of a county ordinance, or by a city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, or by a county counsel of any county within which a city has a population in excess of 750,000, or by a city attorney in a city and county or, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in
 a city having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of a board, officer, person, corporation, or association, or by a person who has suffered injury in fact and has lost money or property as a result of the unfair competition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   (SB 461)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

17205.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.

Civil Penalty for Violation of Chapter

(a) Any person who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in unfair competition shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, by any district attorney, by any county counsel authorized by agreement with the district attorney in actions involving violation of a county ordinance, by any city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, or by a county counsel of any county within which a city has a population in excess of 750,000,
 by any city attorney of any city and county, or, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in any city having a full-time city prosecutor, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) The court shall impose a civil penalty for each violation of this chapter. In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following: the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(c) (1) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be
 paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund.

(2) If the action is brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) and subdivision (e), if the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(B) If the action is brought by the City Attorney of San Diego, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the City of San Diego.

(4) The aforementioned funds shall be for the exclusive use by the Attorney General, the district attorney, the county counsel, and the city attorney for the enforcement of consumer protection laws.

(d) The Unfair Competition Law Fund is hereby created as a special account within the General Fund in the State Treasury. The portion of penalties that is payable to the General Fund or to the Treasurer recovered by the Attorney General from an action or settlement of a claim made by the Attorney General pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 shall be deposited into this fund. Moneys in this fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used by the Attorney General to support investigations and prosecutions of California’s consumer protection laws, including implementation of judgments obtained from such prosecutions or investigations and other activities which are in furtherance of this
 chapter or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, any civil penalties deposited in the fund pursuant to the National Mortgage Settlement, as provided in Section 12531 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the Department of Justice for the purpose of offsetting General Fund costs incurred by the Department of Justice.

(e) If the action is brought at the request of a board within the Department of Consumer Affairs or a local consumer affairs agency, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses incurred by the board or local agency in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (c), the amount of any reasonable expenses incurred by the board shall be paid to the Treasurer for deposit in the special fund of the board described in Section 205. If
 the board has no such special fund, the moneys shall be paid to the Treasurer. The amount of any reasonable expenses incurred by a local consumer affairs agency shall be paid to the general fund of the municipality or county that funds the local agency.

(f) If the action is brought by a city attorney of a city and county, the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city and county in which the judgment was entered for the exclusive use by the city attorney for the enforcement of consumer protection laws. However, if the action is brought by a city attorney of a city and county for the purposes of civil enforcement pursuant to Section 17980 of the Health and Safety Code or Article 3 (commencing with Section 11570) of Chapter 10 of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, either the penalty collected shall be paid entirely to the treasurer of the city and county in which the judgment was entered or, upon the
 request of the city attorney, the court may order that up to one-half of the penalty, under court supervision and approval, be paid for the purpose of restoring, maintaining, or enhancing the premises that were the subject of the action, and that the balance of the penalty be paid to the treasurer of the city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   (SB 461)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.1.

(a) (1) In addition to any liability for a civil penalty pursuant to Section 17206, a person who violates this chapter, and the act or acts of unfair competition are perpetrated against one or more senior citizens or disabled persons, may be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action as prescribed in Section 17206.

(2) Subject to subdivision (d), any civil penalty shall be paid as prescribed by subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 17206.

(b) As used in this section, the following
 terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Senior citizen” means a person who is 65 years of age or older.

(2) “Disabled person” means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities.

(A) As used in this subdivision, “physical or mental impairment” means any of the following:

(i) A physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss substantially affecting one or more of the following body systems: neurological; musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory, including speech organs; cardiovascular; reproductive; digestive; genitourinary; hemic and lymphatic; skin; or endocrine.

(ii) A mental or
 psychological disorder, including intellectual disability, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities.

“Physical or mental impairment” includes, but is not limited to, diseases and conditions including orthopedic, visual, speech, and hearing impairment, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, muscular dystrophy, multiple sclerosis, cancer, heart disease, diabetes, intellectual disability, and emotional illness.

(B) “Major life activities” means functions that include caring for one’s self, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, and working.

(c) In determining whether to impose a civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (a) and the amount thereof, the court shall consider, in addition to any other appropriate factors, the extent to which one or more of the following
 factors are present:

(1) Whether the defendant knew or should have known that his or her conduct was directed to one or more senior citizens or disabled persons.

(2) Whether the defendant’s conduct caused one or more senior citizens or disabled persons to suffer any of the following: loss or encumbrance of a primary residence, principal employment, or source of income; substantial loss of property set aside for retirement, or for personal or family care and maintenance; or substantial loss of payments received under a pension or retirement plan or a government benefits program, or assets essential to the health or welfare of the senior citizen or disabled person.

(3) Whether one or more senior citizens or disabled persons are substantially more vulnerable than other members of the public to the defendant’s conduct
 because of age, poor health or infirmity, impaired understanding, restricted mobility, or disability, and actually suffered substantial physical, emotional, or economic damage resulting from the defendant’s conduct.

(d) A court of competent jurisdiction hearing an action pursuant to this section may make orders and judgments as necessary to restore to a senior citizen or disabled person money or property, real or personal that may have been acquired by means of a violation of this chapter. Restitution ordered pursuant to this subdivision shall be given priority over recovery of a civil penalty designated by the court as imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), but shall not be given priority over a civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17206. If the court determines that full restitution cannot be made to those senior citizens or disabled persons, either at the time of judgment or by a future date determined by the court,
 then restitution under this subdivision shall be made on a pro rata basis depending on the amount of loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.2.

(a) (1) In addition to any liability for a civil penalty pursuant to Section 17206, a person who violates this chapter, if the act or acts of unfair competition are perpetrated against one or more service members or veterans, may be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action as prescribed in Section 17206.

(2) Any civil penalty shall be paid as prescribed by subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 17206.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Service member” means a person who is a member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard, or the active militia of this state.

(2) “Veteran” means a person who was formerly a service member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (SB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.

(a) Any person who intentionally violates any injunction prohibiting unfair competition issued pursuant to Section 17203 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each violation. Where the conduct constituting a violation is of a continuing nature, each day of that conduct is a separate and distinct violation. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of the harm caused by the conduct constituting a violation, the nature and persistence of that conduct, the length of time over which the conduct occurred, the assets, liabilities, and net worth of the person, whether corporate or individual, and any corrective action taken by the defendant.

(b) The civil penalty prescribed by this section shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any county in which the violation occurs or where the injunction was issued in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, any county counsel of any county within which a city has a population in excess of 750,000 or any county counsel that is authorized by agreement with the district attorney in actions involving violation of a county ordinance, or any city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction within the attorney’s jurisdiction without regard to the county from
 which the original injunction was issued. An action brought pursuant to this section to recover civil penalties shall take precedence over all civil matters on the calendar of the court except those matters to which equal precedence on the calendar is granted by law.

(c) If such an action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the city, except that if the action was brought by a city attorney of a city and county the entire amount of the
 penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city and county in which the judgment is entered.

(d) If the action is brought at the request of a board within the Department of Consumer Affairs or a local consumer affairs agency, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses incurred by the board or local agency in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (c), the amount of the reasonable expenses incurred by the board shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the special fund of the board described in Section 205. If the board has no such special fund, the moneys shall be paid to the State Treasurer. The amount of the reasonable expenses incurred by a local consumer affairs agency shall be paid to the general fund of the municipality or county which funds the local
 agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 140, Sec. 3.   (SB 461)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17208.

Any action to enforce any cause of action pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrued. No cause of action barred under existing law on the effective date of this section shall be revived by its enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.

If a violation of this chapter is alleged or the application or construction of this chapter is in issue in any proceeding in the Supreme Court of California, a state court of appeal, or the appellate division of a superior court, each person filing any brief or petition with the court in that proceeding shall serve, within three days of filing with the court, a copy of that brief or petition on the Attorney General, directed to the attention of the Consumer Protection Section at a service address designated on the Attorney General’s official internet website for service of papers under this section or, if no service address is designated, at the Attorney General’s office in the City of San Francisco and on the district attorney of the county in which the lower court action or proceeding was originally filed.
 Upon the Attorney General’s or district attorney’s request, each person who has filed any other document, including all or a portion of the appellate record, with the court in addition to a brief or petition shall provide a copy of that document without charge to the Attorney General or the district attorney within five days of the request. The time for service may be extended by the Chief Justice or presiding justice or judge for good cause shown. No judgment or relief, temporary or permanent, shall be granted or opinion issued until proof of service of the brief or petition on the Attorney General and district attorney is filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.
